District of Columbia statutes.
33-523

Repealed

Order of distribution of assets.

Repealed.

Sept. 28, 1962, 76 Stat. 660, Pub. L. 87-716, § 23
Dec. 10, 1987, D.C. Law 7-49, § 1105, 34 DCR 6856
1981 Ed., § 41-223.
1973 Ed., § 41-423.